Maryland, session 2026, SB0810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0810*

SENATE BILL 810
(j) “School resource officer” means:
(1) A law enforcement officer as defined under § 1–101(c) of the Public
Safety Article who has been assigned to a school in accordance with a memorandum of
understanding between the chief of a law enforcement agency as defined under § 3–201(d)
of the Public Safety Article and the local education agency; or
(2) A Baltimore City school police officer, as defined in § 4–318 of this
article.
(k) “School security employee” means an individual, as defined in regulations
adopted by the Subcabinet, who:
(1) Is not a school resource officer; and
(2) Is employed by a local school system to provide safety and
security–related services at a public school.
7–1508.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PUBLIC SCHOOL SECURITY PERSONNEL” MEANS:
(1) A SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER, AS DEFINED IN § 7–1501 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) A SCHOOL SECURITY EMPLOYEE, AS DEFINED IN § 7–1501 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; OR
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO:
(I) IS NOT DIRECTLY ASSIGNED TO OR EMPLOYED BY A PUBLIC
SCHOOL;
(II) HAS NOT COMPLETED THE CENTER’S SCHOOL RESOURCE
OFFICER AND SCHOOL SECURITY EMPLOYEE TRAINING ACADEMY; AND
(III) PROVIDES ADEQUATE LAW ENFORCEMENT COVERAGE TO
PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY AND THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(B) PUBLIC SCHOOL SECURITY PERSONNEL MAY NOT:
(1) BE USED FOR PURPOSES OF OR OTHERWISE ENGAGE IN FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION INVESTIGATION OR ENFORCEMENT FUNCTIONS UNDER § 287(G) OF
THE FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AND NATIONALITY ACT AT THE PUBLIC SCHOOL; OR

SENATE BILL 810 3
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
PRODUCE OR SHARE INFORMATION OR A DOCUMENT PERTAINING TO STUDENT
EDUCATIONAL RECORDS OR EMPLOYEE PERSONNEL RECORDS OR ANY OTHER
INFORMATION ABOUT OR FROM A STUDENT, A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE, OR A
STUDENT’S OR A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE’S FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD FOR
PURPOSES OF FEDERAL IMMIGRATION INVESTIGATION OR ENFORCEMENT.
(C) PUBLIC SCHOOL SECURITY PERSONNEL SHALL IMMEDIATELY CONTACT
THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT AND LEGAL COUNSEL FOR THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM IF PRESENTED WITH A VALID:
(1) JUDICIAL WARRANT;
(2) JUDICIAL SUBPOENA; OR
(3) A LEGAL ORDER FOR THE PRODUCTION OF INFORMATION OR A
DOCUMENT REGARDING THE INDIVIDUALS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)
OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED CONSISTENTLY WITH ANY
APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE PRIVACY LAWS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.